Nebraska, session 109, LB1069.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1069 LB1069
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 38-1201, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
38-1201 Sections 38-1201 to 38-1239 and section 2 of this act shall
be known and may be cited as the Emergency Medical Services Practice Act.
Sec. 2. (1) An emergency care provider shall not be eligible to
receive state-funded emergency medical services grant assistance
administered by the department unless such provider certifies, on a form
prescribed by the department, that the provider maintains and implements
a policy for billing for services by submitting claims to public or
private third-party payors, if appropriate.
(2) For purposes of this section, billing for services means the
regular submission of a claim for reimbursement to medicare, medicaid, a
private health insurer, or a legally responsible third-party payor for
emergency or non-emergency medical services provided by the emergency
care provider.
Sec. 3. Original section 38-1201, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is repealed.
-2-